Utah statutes.
34-29-15.   False statements -- Failure to keep registers -- Other violations -- Penalty.

(1)  If a person engaged in the business of employment or intelligence agent or broker licensed under this chapter does the following, that person is liable under Subsection (2):

(a)  gives any false information or makes any misstatement or any false promises concerning any work, employment, or occupation;

(b)  fails to keep the registers as prescribed in Sections 34-29-11 and 34-29-12;

(c)  willfully makes any false entries in a register under Section 34-29-11 or 34-29-12; or

(d)  violates any other provision of this chapter.

(2)  If a person violates Subsection (1) and no penalty is otherwise provided in this chapter, the person shall for each and every offense be fined in any sum not exceeding $200, and in the discretion of the trial court, the person's license may be revoked.

